Wisconsin, session 2025, AB948.
do enact as follows:AB948,11Section 1. 115.28 (38) of the statutes, as created by 2025 Wisconsin Act 42, is 2amended to read:AB948,2,63115.28 (38) Prohibited uses of wireless communication devices; 4policies. Within 14 days after receiving a policy or updated policy under s. 120.12 5(29) (d) or (30) (d), submit the policy or updated policy to the office of school safety in 6the department of justice and the legislative council.AB948,27Section 2. 115.28 (38) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act .... 8(this act), is amended to read:AB948,2,129115.28 (38) Prohibited uses of wireless communication devices; 10policies. Within 14 days after receiving a policy or updated policy under s. 120.12 11(29) (d) or (30) (d), submit the policy or updated policy to the office of school safety in 12the department of justice and the legislative council.AB948,313Section 3. 119.04 (1) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Acts 42 14and 79, is amended to read:AB948,3,1015119.04 (1) Subchapters IV, V and VII of ch. 115, ch. 121 and ss. 66.0235 (3) (c), 1666.0603 (1m) to (3), 115.01 (1) and (2), 115.28, 115.31, 115.33, 115.34, 115.343, 17115.345, 115.363, 115.364, 115.365 (3), 115.366, 115.367, 115.38 (2), 115.415, 1115.445, 118.001 to 118.04, 118.045, 118.06 to 118.076, 118.10, 118.12, 118.124, 2118.125 to 118.14, 118.145 (4), 118.15, 118.153, 118.16, 118.162, 118.163, 118.164, 3118.18, 118.19, 118.196, 118.20, 118.223, 118.225, 118.24 (1), (2) (c) to (f), (6), (8), 4and (10), 118.245, 118.25, 118.255, 118.291, 118.292, 118.293, 118.2935, 118.30 to 5118.43, 118.46, 118.50, 118.51, 118.52, 118.53, 118.55, 118.56, 118.58, 120.12 (2m), 6(4m), (5), (15) to (27), and (29), and (30), 120.125, 120.13 (1), (2) (b) to (g), (3), (14), 7(17) to (19), (26), (34), (35), (37), (37m), and (38), 120.137, 120.14, 120.20, 120.21 (3), 8and 120.25 are applicable to a 1st class city school district and board but not, unless 9explicitly provided in this chapter or in the terms of a contract, to the commissioner 10or to any school transferred to an opportunity schools and partnership program.AB948,411Section 4. 119.04 (1) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act .... 12(this act), is amended to read:AB948,4,213119.04 (1) Subchapters IV, V and VII of ch. 115, ch. 121 and ss. 66.0235 (3) (c), 1466.0603 (1m) to (3), 115.01 (1) and (2), 115.28, 115.31, 115.33, 115.34, 115.343, 15115.345, 115.363, 115.364, 115.365 (3), 115.366, 115.367, 115.38 (2), 115.415, 16115.445, 118.001 to 118.04, 118.045, 118.06 to 118.076, 118.10, 118.12, 118.124, 17118.125 to 118.14, 118.145 (4), 118.15, 118.153, 118.16, 118.162, 118.163, 118.164, 18118.18, 118.19, 118.196, 118.20, 118.223, 118.225, 118.24 (1), (2) (c) to (f), (6), (8), 19and (10), 118.245, 118.25, 118.255, 118.291, 118.292, 118.293, 118.2935, 118.30 to 20118.43, 118.46, 118.50, 118.51, 118.52, 118.53, 118.55, 118.56, 118.58, 120.12 (2m), 21(4m), (5), (15) to (27), (29), and (30), 120.125, 120.13 (1), (2) (b) to (g), (3), (14), (17) to 22(19), (26), (34), (35), (37), (37m), and (38), 120.137, 120.14, 120.20, 120.21 (3), and 23120.25 are applicable to a 1st class city school district and board but not, unless 1explicitly provided in this chapter or in the terms of a contract, to the commissioner 2or to any school transferred to an opportunity schools and partnership program.AB948,53Section 5. 120.12 (29) (title) of the statutes, as created by 2025 Wisconsin 4Act 42, is amended to read:AB948,4,65120.12 (29) (title) Prohibited uses of wireless communication devices 6during instructional time.AB948,67Section 6. 120.12 (29) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act .... 8(this act), is repealed.AB948,79Section 7. 120.12 (30) of the statutes is created to read:AB948,4,2110120.12 (30) Prohibited uses of wireless communication devices during 11the school day. (a) By July 1, 2027, adopt a wireless communication device policy 12that prohibits pupils from using a wireless communication device, other than a 13school-district-issued wireless communication device, during the school day. A 14school board may include in the policy under this paragraph a provision for the use 15of pouches or other on-site storage for wireless communication devices; a 16prohibition on pupils possessing wireless communication devices on school 17premises during the school day, notwithstanding par. (b) 2.; or consequences for a 18pupil violating the policy, including confiscating a pupil’s wireless communication 19device for the remainder of the school day. In this subsection, “school day” means 20the scheduled hours of direct pupil instruction, recess, time for pupils to transfer 21between classes, and lunch period on each day on which school is in session.AB948,4,2222(b) Include all of the following in a policy under par. (a):AB948,5,2231. That “wireless communication device” means a portable wireless device 1that has the capability to provide voice, messaging, or other data communication 2between 2 or more parties and includes all of the following:AB948,5,33a. A cellular telephone.AB948,5,44b. A tablet computer.AB948,5,55c. A laptop computer.AB948,5,66d. A gaming device.AB948,5,772. Exceptions to the prohibition required under par. (a) for all of the following:AB948,5,88a. In the event of an emergency or a perceived threat.AB948,5,99b. To manage the pupil’s health care.AB948,5,1110c. A use included in a pupil’s individualized education program or a plan 11developed under section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973.AB948,5,1312d. A use authorized by a teacher for educational purposes during instructional 13time.AB948,5,1514(c) Annually, provide each pupil enrolled in the school district with a copy of 15the policy under par. (a).AB948,5,1816(d) 1. By no later than October 1, 2027, submit a copy of the policy under par. 17(a), or if applicable, a policy that is more restrictive than what is required under this 18subsection, to the department.AB948,5,22192. By no later than October 1, 2028, and each October 1 thereafter, notify the 20department of whether changes were made to the policy submitted under this 21paragraph in the previous school year, and if changes were made, submit the 22updated policy to the department.AB948,6,223(e) Nothing in this subsection prohibits a school board from adopting a policy 1relating to the use or possession of wireless communication devices by pupils that is 2more restrictive than what is required under this subsection.AB948,83Section 8. Effective dates. This act takes effect on the day after 4publication, except as follows:AB948,6,75(1) Use of wireless communication devices during instructional time. 6The treatment of ss. 115.28 (38) (by Section 2) and 119.04 (1) (by Section 4) and 7the repeal of s. 120.12 (29) take effect on July 1, 2027.AB948,6,88